New York, session 2025-2026, A8425.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The veterans' services law is amended by adding a new 2 section 29-e to read as follows: 3 § 29-e. Veterans' employment review. 1. Legislative intent. It is only 4 proper that those in government help the heroes who volunteered to serve 5 in the military make a successful transition to civilian life and 6 employment. 7 Leaving military service for civilian employment can be challenging 8 for many veterans who may have difficulty translating military quali- 9 fications, skills, and experiences when applying to civilian jobs. Yet, 10 veterans have a diverse pool of skill sets that make them invaluable 11 assets in a wide variety of fields across the public and private sectors 12 and possess a wealth of experience that would be helpful in any employ- 13 ment situation, whether as a team member or in a leadership role. 14 The legislature is aware that the current federal government has been 15 reducing the federal workforce with a disproportionate impact on veter- 16 ans. It is therefore, important that the state of New York increase its 17 efforts to help those veterans who have recently been displaced from 18 their careers in the federal government and help them find a path to 19 employment and success in the state of New York. 20 2. Study established. The department, in consultation with the depart- 21 ments of civil service and labor, the governor's office of employee 22 relations, at least two representatives of labor organizations as 23 defined in section two hundred ninety-two of the executive law, and the 24 president of the New York state county veterans' service officers asso- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13112-01-5 A. 8425 2 1 ciation, is hereby authorized and directed to conduct a study regarding 2 veterans' employment opportunities and incentives. Such study shall be 3 completed and a report submitted to the governor, the temporary presi- 4 dent of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly on or before Decem- 5 ber thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven. 6 3. Study requirements. The veterans' employment review shall compre- 7 hensively study efforts that can be made to improve and increase veteran 8 employment opportunities in the state including but not limited to: 9 (a) reviewing the current system of awarding civil service credit 10 pursuant to law, including the requirements of section six of article 11 five of the state constitution; 12 (b) analyzing the benefits of awarding civil service credit to veter- 13 ans based on a variety of different factors including, but not limited 14 to, military occupational specialty, combat experience, or the award of 15 certain decorations, medals, badges, citations and campaign ribbons; 16 (c) reviewing the adequacy of employment protections for veterans in 17 current law; 18 (d) reviewing methods, including the awarding of additional civil 19 service credits, that can be implemented by employers to more easily 20 facilitate the recruitment and onboarding of veteran employees who are 21 former employees of the federal government and who were dismissed from 22 federal employment on or after January twentieth, two thousand twenty- 23 five, including but not limited to those under Executive Order 14210, 90 24 Federal Registry 9669 (February 11, 2025); and 25 (e) providing recommendations on additional incentives that employers 26 can use to recruit and retain veteran employees. 27 4. Definition. The term "employer" shall have the same meaning as 28 defined in section two hundred ninety-two of the executive law. 29 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 30 have become a law.